Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.40.350

Suspension and expulsion.

Any student may be suspended or expelled from The Evergreen State College who is found to be guilty of an infraction of the regulations of the institution.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 77; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.350. Prior: 1961 ex.s. c 13 s 2, part; prior: (i) 1909 c 97 p 255 s 13; RRS s 4620. (ii) 1921 c 136 s 1, part; 1905 c 85 s 3, part; RRS s 4616, part. Formerly RCW 28.81.070.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.